Virginia statutes. Title 32.1. Health.
Article 2.1. Statewide Emergency Medical Services System and Services.
§ 32.1-111.13.
Annual financial reports.

The Virginia Association of Volunteer Rescue Squads shall submit an annual financial report on the use of funds received from the special emergency medical services fund to the Advisory Board Executive Committee on such forms and providing such information as may be required by the Advisory Board Executive Committee for such purpose.

History.

1996, c. 899; 2013, c. 517; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendment by c. 517 deleted “its” following “the use of,” inserted “received from the special emergency medical services fund,” and inserted “Executive Committee” in two places.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and substituted “The” for “Effective on July 1, 1996, the” at the beginning of the paragraph and deleted “State Emergency Medical Services” preceding “Advisory.”

§ 32.1-111.14.
Powers of governing bodies of counties, cities, and towns.

Upon finding as fact, after notice and public hearing, that exercise of the powers enumerated below is necessary to assure the provision of adequate and continuing emergency medical services and to preserve, protect and promote the public health, safety and general welfare, the governing body of any county or city is empowered to:

Enact an ordinance making it unlawful to operate any emergency medical services vehicle or class thereof established by the Board in such county or city without having been granted a franchise, license or permit to do so;

Grant franchises, licenses or permits to emergency medical services agencies based within or outside the county or city; however, any emergency medical services agency in operation in any county or city on June 28, 1968, that continues to operate as such, up to and including the effective date of any ordinance adopted pursuant to this section, and that submits to the governing body of the county or city satisfactory evidence of such continuing operation, shall be granted a franchise, license or permit by such governing body to serve at least that part of the county or city in which the agency has continuously operated if all other requirements of this article are met;

Limit the number of emergency medical services vehicles to be operated within the county or city and by any emergency medical services agency;

Determine and prescribe areas of franchised, licensed or permitted service within the county or city;

Fix and change from time to time reasonable charges for franchised, licensed or permitted services;

Set minimum limits of liability insurance coverage for emergency medical services vehicles;

Contract with franchised, licensed or permitted emergency medical services agencies for emergency medical services vehicle transportation services to be rendered upon call of a county or municipal agency or department and for transportation of bona fide indigents or persons certified by the local board of social services to be public assistance or social services recipients; and

Establish other necessary regulations consistent with statutes or regulations of the Board relating to operation of emergency medical services vehicles.

In addition to the powers set forth above, the governing body of any county or city is authorized to provide, or cause to be provided, services of emergency medical services vehicles; to own, operate and maintain emergency medical services vehicles; to make reasonable charges for use of emergency medical services vehicles, including charging insurers for emergency medical services vehicle transportation services as authorized by §

38.2-3407.9

; and to contract with any emergency medical services agency for the services of its emergency medical services vehicles.

Any incorporated town may exercise, within its corporate limits only, all those powers enumerated in subsections A and B either upon the request of a town to the governing body of the county wherein the town lies and upon the adoption by the county governing body of a resolution permitting such exercise, or after 180 days’ written notice to the governing body of the county if the county is not exercising such powers at the end of such 180-day period.

No county ordinance enacted, or other county action taken, pursuant to powers granted herein shall be effective within an incorporated town in such county which is at the time exercising such powers until 180 days after written notice to the governing body of the town.

Nothing herein shall be construed to authorize any county to regulate in any manner emergency medical services vehicles owned and operated by a town or to authorize any town to regulate in any manner emergency medical services vehicles owned and operated by a county.

Emergency medical services vehicles operated by a county, city, or town under authority of this section shall be subject to the provisions of this article and to the regulations of the Board.

History.

1996, c. 899; 2002, c. 747; 2005, c. 182; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2002 amendments.

The 2002 amendment by c. 747, effective October 1, 2002, substituted “social services to be public assistance or social services” for “public welfare or social services to be public assistance” in subdivision A 7; and deleted “of this section” following “subsections A and B” in subsection C.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 182 inserted “including charging insurers for ambulance services as authorized by §

38.2-3407.9

” in subsection B.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical and throughout the section, inserted “emergency medical services” preceding “agency” or variants and “license” following “franchise” or variants; inserted “medical” preceding “services” in subsection A; in subdivision A 1, inserted “any” following “operate” and substituted “vehicle or class” for “vehicles or any class”; substituted “emergency medical services vehicle transportation services” for “transportation” preceding “to” in subdivision A 7; substituted “emergency medical services vehicle transportation” for “ambulance” in subsection B; in subsection F, deleted “Any” at the beginning of the paragraph and “adopted thereunder” at the end of the paragraph.

§ 32.1-111.14:1.
Repealed by Acts 2003, c. 978, cl. 2, effective April 2, 2003.

Cross references.

As to exemption from liability of persons operating an automated external defibrillator at the scene of an emergency, and training of the public on CPR and automated external defibrillator, see §

8.01-225

.

§ 32.1-111.14:2.
Establishment of emergency medical services zones or districts; tax levies.

The governing bodies of the several counties or cities of the Commonwealth may create and establish, by designation on a map of the county or city showing current, official parcel boundaries, or by any other description that is legally sufficient for the conveyance of property or the creation of parcels, emergency medical services zones or districts in such counties or cities within which may be located and established one or more emergency medical services agencies for providing emergency medical services within such zones or districts.

In the event of the creation of such zones or districts in any county or city, the county or city governing body may acquire, in the name of the county or city, real or personal property to be devoted to the uses aforesaid and shall prescribe rules and regulations for the proper management, control, and conduct thereof. Such governing body shall also have authority to contract with, or secure the services of, any individual corporation, organization, or municipal corporation or any volunteer emergency medical services agency or emergency medical services provider for such emergency medical services as may be required.

To raise funds for the purposes aforesaid, the governing body of any county or city in which such zones or districts are established may levy annually a tax on the assessed value of all property, real and personal, within such zones or districts, subject to local taxation, which tax shall be extended and collected as other county or city taxes are extended and collected. However, any property located in Augusta County that has qualified for an agricultural or forestal use-value assessment pursuant to Article 4 (§

58.1-3229

et seq.) of Chapter 32 of Title 58.1 may not be included within such a zone or district and may not be subject to such tax. In any county or city having a population between 25,000 and 25,500, the maximum rate of tax under this section shall be $0.30 on $100 of assessed value.

The amount realized from such levy shall be kept separate from all other moneys of the county or city and shall be applied to no other purpose than the maintenance and operation of the emergency medical services agencies established pursuant to this section.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.14:3.
Exclusion of certain areas from emergency medical services zones or districts and exemption of such areas from certain levies.

The governing body of any county or city having an emergency medical services zone or district created under the provisions of §

32.1-111.14:2

, prior to June 1 of any calendar year, may alter the boundaries of such emergency medical services zone or district for the purpose of excluding an area of any such emergency medical services zone or district that is also within the boundaries of a sanitary district providing emergency medical services or under contract to a sanitary district providing emergency medical services.

Any area excluded from an emergency medical services zone or district as provided by this section shall not be subject to the levy set forth in §

32.1-111.14:2

for the year such area is excluded.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.14:4.
Advances by county or city to emergency medical services zone or district; reimbursement; validation of prior advances.

The governing body of any county or city in the Commonwealth may advance funds, not otherwise specifically allocated or obligated, from the general fund to an emergency medical services zone or district to assist the emergency medical services zone or district to exercise the powers set forth in §

32.1-111.14:2

.

Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law, the governing body shall direct the treasurer to reimburse the general fund of the county or city from the proceeds of any funds to the credit of the emergency medical services zone or district, not otherwise specifically allocated or obligated, to the extent that the county or city has made advances to the emergency medical services zone or district from such general fund to assist the emergency medical services zone or district to exercise the powers set forth in §

32.1-111.14:2

.

The advancement of any funds heretofore advanced from the general fund by the governing body of any county or city in the Commonwealth for the benefit of an emergency medical services zone or district in exercising the lawful powers of such emergency medical services zone or district is hereby validated and confirmed.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.14:5.
Authority of emergency medical services agency incident commander when operating at an emergency incident; penalty for refusal to obey orders.

Except as provided in §

32.1-111.14:6

, while any emergency medical services personnel are in the process of operating at an emergency incident where there is imminent danger and when emergency medical services personnel are returning to the emergency medical services agency, the incident commander of such emergency medical services agency at that time shall have the authority to (i) maintain order at such emergency incident or its vicinity, (ii) direct the actions of emergency medical services personnel at the incident, (iii) notwithstanding the provisions of §§ 46.2-888 through 46.2-891, keep bystanders or other persons at a safe distance from the incident and emergency equipment, (iv) facilitate the speedy movement and operation of emergency equipment and emergency medical services personnel, and (v) until the arrival of a police officer, direct and control traffic in person or by deputy and facilitate the movement of traffic. The emergency medical services agency incident commander shall display his emergency medical services personnel’s badge or other proper means of identification. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this authority shall extend to the activation of traffic control signals designed to facilitate the safe egress and ingress of emergency equipment at an emergency medical services agency. Any person refusing to obey the orders of the emergency medical services incident commander at that time is guilty of a Class 4 misdemeanor. The authority granted under the provisions of this section may not be exercised to inhibit or obstruct members of law-enforcement agencies or fire departments or fire companies from performing their normal duties when operating at such emergency incident, nor to conflict with or diminish the lawful authority, duties, and responsibilities of forest wardens, including but not limited to the provisions of Chapter 11 (§ 10.1-1100 et seq.) of Title 10.1. Personnel from the news media, such as the press, radio, and television, when gathering the news may enter at their own risk into the incident area only when the incident commander has deemed the area safe and only into those areas of the incident that do not, in the opinion of the incident commander, interfere with the emergency medical services personnel dealing with such emergencies, in which case the emergency medical services incident commander may order such person from the scene of the emergency incident.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.14:6.
Supervision and control of joint services of emergency medical services agencies.

Whenever two or more emergency medical services agencies are called to provide joint services in any district or political subdivision, the incident commander of the first agency to arrive shall have general supervision and control of all such participating agencies until an officer of such district or political subdivision who is otherwise authorized by law to do so shall assume such general supervision and control.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.14:7.
Penalty for disobeying emergency medical services agency chief or other officer in command.

If any person at a fire or medical emergency refuses or neglects to obey any order duly given by the individual having command of the incident in accordance with §

32.1-111.14:5

or

32.1-111.14:6

, he shall, upon conviction of such offense, be fined not to exceed $100.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.14:8.
Purchase, maintenance, etc., of equipment; donated equipment.

The governing body of every county, city, or town shall have power to provide for the purchase, operation, staffing, and maintenance of suitable equipment for providing emergency medical services in or upon the property of the county, city, or town and of its inhabitants and to prescribe the terms and conditions upon which the same will be used for providing emergency medical services in or upon privately owned property.

Any emergency medical services agency donating equipment for providing emergency medical services to any other emergency medical services agency, which equipment met existing engineering and safety standards at the time of its purchase by the donating entity, shall be immune from civil liability unless the donating entity acted with gross negligence or willful misconduct.

A safety inspection must be completed by a certified emergency medical services vehicle service center and a report designating any deficiencies shall be provided prior to the change in ownership of the donated emergency medical services vehicle.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.14:9.
Entry of buildings and premises adjoining during a medical emergency.

The incident commander at a medical emergency, and his subordinates, upon his order or direction, shall have the right at any time of the day or night to enter any building or upon any premises where a medical emergency is in progress, or any building or premises adjacent thereto for the purpose of providing emergency medical services.

The incident commander at a medical emergency, and his subordinates upon his order or direction, shall have the right to remain at the scene of a medical emergency, including remaining in any building or house, for purposes of protecting the property and preventing the public from entry into the premises, until such reasonable time as the owner may resume responsibility for the protection of the property.

History.

2015, cc. 502, 503.

§ 32.1-111.15.
Statewide poison control system established.

From such funds as may be appropriated for this purpose and from such gifts, donations, grants, bequests, and other funds as may be received, the Board shall establish a statewide poison control system. The funding mechanism for the system and its services shall be as provided in the appropriation act.

The Board shall establish poison control centers that meet national certification standards promulgated by the American Association of Poison Control Centers. If such national certification standards are eliminated, the Board shall establish minimum standards for the designation and operation of these poison control centers. The poison control centers established by the Board shall report to the Board by October 1 of each year regarding program operations; expenditures; revenues, including in-kind contributions; financial status; future needs; and summaries of human poison exposure cases for the most recent calendar year.

The statewide system shall provide, at a minimum, (i) consultation, by free, 24-hour emergency telephone or other means of communication, to the public and to health care providers regarding the ingestion or application of substances, including determinations of emergency treatment, coordination of referrals to emergency treatment facilities, and provision of appropriate information to the staffs of such facilities; (ii) prevention education and information about poison control services; (iii) training for health care providers in toxicology and medical management of poison exposure cases; and (iv) poison control surveillance through the collection and analysis of data from reported poison exposures to identify poisoning hazards, prevent poisonings, and improve treatment of poisoned patients.

History.

1996, c. 899; 2015, cc. 502, 503.

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendments by cc. 502 and 503 are identical, substituted “Board” for “Board of Health” in the first sentence and twice substituted “providers” for “practitioners” in the third paragraph.

§ 32.1-111.15:1.
Department responsible for stroke care quality improvement; sharing of data and information.

The Department shall be responsible for stroke care quality improvement initiatives in the Commonwealth. Such initiatives shall include:

Implementing systems to collect data and information about stroke care in the Commonwealth in accordance with subsection B;

Facilitating information and data sharing and collaboration among hospitals and health care providers to improve the quality of stroke care in the Commonwealth;

Requiring the application of evidence-based treatment guidelines for transitioning patients to community-based follow-up care following acute treatment for stroke; and

Establishing a process for continuous quality improvement for the delivery of stroke care by the statewide system for stroke response and treatment in accordance with subsection C.

The Department shall implement systems to collect data and information related to stroke care (i) that are nationally recognized data set platforms with confidentiality standards approved by the Centers for Medicare and Medicaid Services or consistent with the Get With The Guidelines-Stroke registry platform from hospitals designated as comprehensive stroke centers, primary stroke centers, or acute stroke-ready hospitals and emergency medical services agencies in the Commonwealth and (ii) from every primary stroke center with supplementary levels of stroke care distinction in the Commonwealth. Every hospital designated as a comprehensive stroke center, primary stroke center, or primary stroke center with supplementary levels of stroke care distinction shall report data and information described in clauses (i) and (ii) to the Department. The Department shall take steps to encourage hospitals designated as acute stroke-ready hospitals and emergency medical services agencies to report data and information described in clause (i) to the Department.

The Department shall develop a process for continuous quality improvement for the delivery of stroke care provided by the statewide system for stroke response and treatment, which shall include:

Collection and analysis of data related to stroke care in the Commonwealth;

Identification of potential interventions to improve stroke care in specific geographic areas of the Commonwealth; and

Development of recommendations for improvement of stroke care throughout the Commonwealth.

The Department shall make information contained in the systems established pursuant to subsection B and data and information collected pursuant to subsection C available to licensed hospitals and the Virginia Stroke Systems Task Force, and, upon request, to emergency medical services agencies, regional emergency medical services councils, the State Emergency Medical Services Advisory Board, and other entities engaged in the delivery of emergency medical services in the Commonwealth to facilitate the evaluation and improvement of stroke care in the Commonwealth.

The Department shall report to the Governor and the General Assembly annually on July 1 on stroke care improvement initiatives undertaken in accordance with this section. Such report shall include a summary report of the data collected pursuant to this section.

Nothing in this article shall require or authorize the disclosure of confidential information in violation of state or federal law or regulations, including the Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act, 42 U.S.C. § 1320d et seq.

History.

2018, cc. 198, 276.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2018, cc. 198 and 276, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of the first enactment of this act shall become effective on January 1, 2019.”

Acts 2018, cc. 198 and 276, cl. 3 provides: “That the Department of Health shall convene a group of stakeholders, which shall include representatives of (i) hospital systems, including at least one hospital system with at least six or more stroke centers in the Commonwealth, recommended by the Virginia Hospital and Healthcare Association; (ii) the Virginia Stroke Systems Task Force; and (iii) the American Heart Association/American Stroke Association, to advise on the implementation of the provisions of this act.”